District of Columbia statutes.
8-1007

Repealed

Mandatory source separation program.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-226, § 8, 36 DCR 595
Mar. 15, 1990, D.C. Law 8-93, § 2(b), 37 DCR 780
Sept. 8, 1990, D.C. Law 8-154, § 2(b), 37 DCR 4045
Sept. 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-178, § 3(d), 41 DCR 5205
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 301(g), 61 DCR 9971
For present law, see Chapters 10B and 10C of this title.
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 7-226, the “D.C. Solid Waste Management & Multi-Material Recycling Act of 1988”, see Mayor’s Order 89-160, July 20, 1989.
For temporary amendments of section, see § 2(b) of the District of Columbia Solid Waste Management and Multi-Material Recycling Act of 1988 Emergency Amendment Act of 1993 (D.C. Act 10-147, November 4, 1993, 40 DCR 8091) and § 2 (b) of the District of Columbia Solid Waste Management and Multi-Material Recycling Act of 1988 Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-185, February 2, 1994, 41 DCR 627).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the District of Columbia Solid Waste Management and Multi-Material Recycling Act of 1988 Emergency Amendment Act of 1992 (D.C. Act 9-346, December 22, 1992, 40 DCR 141).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of District of Columbia Solid Waste Management and Multi-Material Recycling Act of 1988 Temporary Amendment Act of 1993 (D.C. Law 10-86, March 19, 1994, law notification 41 DCR 1636).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of District of Columbia Solid Waste Management and Multi-Material Recycling Act of 1988 Temporary Amendment Act of 1992 (D.C. Law 9-263, March 27, 1993, law notification 40 DCR 2333).
1981 Ed., § 6-3407.
This section is referenced in § 8-1006 and § 8-1008.